District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.12

Repealed

Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 311, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 312, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(12), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Former § 46-303.12 has been recodified as § 46-303.13 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(13).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 312 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “§ 46-303.11. Nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances. ”Upon a finding, which may be made ex parte, that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be unreasonably put at risk by the disclosure of identifying information, or if an existing order so provides, a tribunal shall order that the address of the child or party or other identifying information not be disclosed in a pleading or other document filed in a proceeding under this chapter.”
2001 Ed., § 46-303.11

1981 Ed., § 30-343.11.
This section is referenced in § 46-303.11 and § 46-306.02.